Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3007
Occupation tax; payment; decal; form; display.

(1) The payment of the occupation tax imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act shall be evidenced by a separate decal for each mechanical amusement device signifying payment of the tax, in a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.

(2) Every distributor or operator shall place such decal in a conspicuous place on each mechanical amusement device to denote payment of the tax for each device for the current year.

Laws 1969, c. 635, § 7, p. 2544;

Laws 1977, LB 353, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB538, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB685, § 13.